Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 3. Power Districts.

§ 77-5-101.
Short title.

This article may be cited as “The Power District Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5439; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-103.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires:

“Power district” or “district” means a power district organized under this article, either as originally organized or as the same may be from time to time altered or amended.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city, incorporated town or incorporated village.

“Governing body,” whenever used in relation to any municipality or county, means the body or board, by whatsoever name known, having charge of the governing of such municipality or county and shall be held to include the mayor or other chief executive officer of such municipality or county in any case wherein the concurrence or approval of such officer is required by the law governing such municipality or county for the adoption of any municipal or county ordinance or resolution or other municipal or county act provided for in this article.

“Board of directors,” “directors” or “board” means the board of directors of a power district selected as provided in this article, duly constituted, organized and acting as a board.

“Election unit” means an election district as provided for by Chapter 5 of Title 23, Mississippi Code of 1972.

“Bonds” shall mean and include negotiable bonds, interim certificates or receipts, notes, debentures and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued or the payment thereof assumed by the authority.

“Public utility” or “utility” means the plant, works, system, facilities or properties together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, including contract rights, used and useful primarily for the production, transmission or distribution of electric energy to or for the public for any purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5440; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-105.
Boundaries of power districts.

Power districts, the boundaries of which shall be coterminous with the boundaries of one or more election units, which need not be contiguous, but which shall not be more distant from one another than twenty miles, may be created as hereafter provided in this article, and when so created shall be considered bodies politic and corporate and shall possess and may exercise the powers granted in this article. However, no municipality shall be divided in the creation of a district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-107.
Resolution seeking election authorizing creation of power district.

The governing bodies of one-half or more of the municipalities, if any, proposed to be included in the district [or, (a) if the proposed district includes only territory not within the corporate limits of any municipality, then the governing body or bodies of the county or counties containing such territory, or (b) if the proposed district includes a municipality or municipalities and territory not within the corporate limits of any municipality, then the governing bodies of the municipality, or if more than one, the governing bodies of one-half or more of the total number of municipalities proposed to be included in the district and of the county or counties containing such territory] shall first pass resolutions, declaring the public convenience and necessity demand the creation and maintenance of the power district to be known as the “(giving the name) power district.” Such resolution shall name the municipalities and describe the unincorporated territory, if any, which it is proposed to include in such district. Any such resolutions so passed shall be presented to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county containing a part of the proposed district. Such resolutions shall request that an election be called without delay for determining whether such district shall be created.

Each such resolution shall divide the proposed district into five subdistricts, as provided in Section 77-5-123, giving each a number. In the event that the boundaries of the district as originally proposed are changed at the election, the boundaries of the subdistricts shall be changed as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-109.
Petition seeking election authorizing creation of power district.

In lieu of the resolutions, or any of them, provided for in the preceding section, a petition or petitions may be presented to the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county in which any part of the proposed district is situated, signed by at least ten percent (10%) of the qualified voters in any election unit or units to be included in the proposed district. Said petition shall declare that in the opinion of the petitioners, public convenience and necessity demand the creation and maintenance of a power district, and shall contain the information required by this article of the resolutions referred to in the preceding section. The petition may be on separate sheets of paper, but each sheet shall contain the affidavit of the person who circulated the same, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-111.
Calling of election.

Upon receipt of the certified copies of the resolutions and/or petitions mentioned in the preceding sections, each such board of supervisors shall without delay call an election in each election unit of such county proposed to be included in the district, for the purpose of determining whether the proposed district shall be created, and shall give notice of such election. Such notice shall state the name of the proposed district and describe its boundaries, and shall state the time when such election shall be held and the location of the polling places. The same shall be published at least once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks before the date of said election in some newspaper or newspapers having a general circulation within the proposed district. In case the proposed power district includes election units located in two (2) or more counties, then the board of supervisors of the county in which the largest portion of the territory of the proposed power district is located shall fix the date of such election.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-113.
Conduct of election.

The ballots for said election shall be in such form, shall contain such instructions and shall be of such size and color as are required by Chapter 5 of Title 23, Mississippi Code of 1972, except that there shall appear thereon the following: “Shall the ‘(giving the name thereof) power district’ be created and established?

( ) Yes ( ) No”

Such election and all matters pertaining thereto not otherwise provided for herein shall be held and conducted and the results thereof ascertained, determined and declared in accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 23, Mississippi Code of 1972. No person shall be entitled to vote in such election unless he or she be a qualified elector of an election unit in which such election is held. Such election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election and may be consolidated therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-115.
Canvassing results of election; declaration of creation of district.

Each county board of election commissioners, if more than one (1), shall canvass the returns as required by Section 23-5-169, and shall ascertain and declare the result of such election in each election unit separately and shall further ascertain and determine the total number of qualified electors in each such election unit separately as of the date of such election. Each county board of election commissioners, if more than one (1), shall, within ten (10) days from the date of such election, file with the clerk of the board of supervisors of their county a statement of the result of said election in each such election district separately and of the number of qualified electors in each such election unit as of the date of the election. In the event the proposed power district includes territory located in two or more counties such statement shall also, within the same period of time, be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county in which the largest portion of the territory of the proposed power district is located. The board of supervisors of the county in which such proposed power district is located, or in the event such proposed power district includes territory located in two (2) or more counties, the board of supervisors of the county in which the largest portion of such territory is located, shall promptly canvass all such statements and shall order and declare the district created and composed of the election units in which a majority of those voting on the proposition voted in favor of the creation of the district. The election unit or units so approving the organization of said district shall contain not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the number of qualified voters within the district as first proposed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-117.
Filing of order declaring creation of district.

Such board of supervisors shall thereupon promptly cause a certified copy of the order declaring such power district created to be filed in the office of the secretary of state. A certified copy of such order shall also be filed with the clerk of each municipality included in the proposed district, and with the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county, any unincorporated part of which is included in the proposed district. From and after the filing of such copy of the order with the secretary of state, the creation and incorporation of such district shall be deemed complete.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-119.
Payment of costs incurred in creation of district.

All costs properly incurred by the boards of supervisors and the boards of election commissioners of the respective counties in publishing notice of the election, in employing persons to conduct the same, or in performing other duties imposed by the provisions of this article, shall be paid as other similar expenses of such boards are paid and shall be and become a charge in favor of such boards against the district, to be repaid upon the presentation of proper vouchers therefor to such district, when and as such district has funds available for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-121.
Proceedings contesting creation of district.

No informality in any proceedings or in the conduct of said election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the creation of any district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of such creation is denied shall be commenced within thirty (30) days from the date of filing the order creating the district with the secretary of state, otherwise such creation and the legal existence of said district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5441; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-123.
Subdistricts.

The boundaries of the subdistricts shall be drawn in such a manner that each shall contain approximately an equal number of voters, except that no municipality shall contain more than two (2) subdistricts, nor shall any municipality be divided unless it shall comprise more than one (1) subdistrict. Should the district as finally constituted comprise a smaller area than originally proposed because of the failure of one or more election units or municipalities to approve the district at the election, then at the first meeting of the board of directors the boundaries of the subdistricts shall be redetermined so as to conform to the terms hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5442; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-125.
Alteration of districts.

Whenever a district shall, by resolution of its board, determine that it is in the public interest and in the interest of efficient and economical operation of a utility to alter the territorial limits of a district, it shall so order and certified copies of such order shall be filed with the secretary of state, the clerk of each municipality in the district and the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the district is located. Thereupon the territorial limits of a district shall be considered altered in accordance with such order. However, any territory added to a district must be coterminous with an election unit or units. No additional territory may be added to a district except upon the petition of not less than one-third (1/3) of the qualified voters residing therein, certified as provided in Section 77-5-109. The order of the board hereinabove referred to shall contain a statement of the number and percentage of such petitioners, if any. In the event the boundaries of any election unit or units are changed subsequent to the creation of a district, then the whole of any election unit, any part of which was theretofore within the district, shall automatically become a part of said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5444; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-127.
Consolidation of districts.

Two (2) or more districts may be consolidated by a determination of the board of each district, fixing the terms and conditions of such consolidation. Certified copies of such determination shall be filed with the secretary of state, the clerk of each municipality in the district and the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county in which any portion of the district is located. Thereupon the consolidation shall be effective to create a single district.

Preexisting rights and liabilities shall not be affected by such consolidation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5445; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-129.
Dissolution of districts.

A district shall be considered dissolved:

Where, within two (2) years after its creation, it has not become the owner or operator, or commenced construction, of a public utility. Any time consumed in any proceeding or contest before any judicial or other tribunal shall not be included as part of said two-year period.

Where a district has disposed of all of its utility property and for one (1) year thereafter shall not have owned or operated a public utility.

Where the board has by resolution determined that the continued existence of the district is not in the public interest, and shall have made an order to such effect and filed a certified copy of such order with the secretary of state. However, no district shall be dissolved under this subsection until after an election held in the manner set forth in this article to be called and held by the respective county boards of election commissioners upon the request of the board, except that in lieu of the question prescribed by section 77-5-113 for inclusion on the ballot there shall appear thereon the following: “Shall the ‘(giving the name thereof) power district’ be dissolved?

( )Yes ( ) No”

A majority of those voting in the entire district shall govern.

Any district dissolved in accordance with the provisions of this section shall cease to continue as a body corporate for the purpose of doing business but shall continue as such for such period as may be necessary to settle the business of the district, wind up its affairs, dispose of its assets and settle its obligations, and for no other purpose. Under such circumstances the board shall have the powers of receivers in equity to determine what is in the best interest of creditors and users of the service of the district. In the event of dissolution the assets of the district and the proceeds thereof shall be used first to pay the expenses of settling the affairs of the district, then for the payment of creditors in the order of their priority, and any surplus remaining shall become the property of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5446; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-131.
Government of districts; selection of directors.

The government of each district shall be vested in a board of five (5) directors. There shall be a director for each subdistrict who shall be appointed by the chief executive or executives of the municipality or municipalities (or municipalities and counties if any unincorporated territory is included within said subdistrict) included within said subdistrict. For the purpose of this article the president of the board of supervisors shall be considered as the chief executive of the county.

Within ten (10) days after the creation and incorporation of such district shall have been completed the chief executives (if there be more than one) in each subdistrict shall meet for the selection of a director for said subdistrict, the time and place of such meeting to be designated by the chief executive of the county. If there be only one (1) chief executive in such subdistrict, he shall select the director thereof.

Where a municipality or unincorporated territory contains two subdistricts, the chief executive of such municipality or county shall select a director for each subdistrict, and shall file forthwith certified copies thereof as provided by subsection (4) of this section.

In the selection of a director, each chief executive (if there be more than one ) shall have one (1) vote for each one hundred (100) voters or major portion thereof within his municipality or unincorporated county territory, as the case may be, or such part thereof as is located in said subdistrict. A majority vote shall be necessary for the selection of a director. The result of said selection shall be certified to by the chairman of said meeting (or by the chief executive, if there be only one) and forthwith filed with the secretary of state and the clerk of each municipality and the clerk of the board of supervisors of each county any unincorporated part of which is included in said district. Such meeting may be adjourned from time to time.

The meeting of the chief executives for the selection of directors subsequent to the initial selection of directors shall be held within the district on the second Tuesday in April in even numbered years prior to the expiration of the term of any director. The secretary of the district shall designate the time and place of each such meeting. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, every selection of a director subsequent to the intitial selection of directors shall be made in the manner provided by this article for the initial selection of directors.

The secretary of the district, appointed pursuant to Section 77-5-143, shall obtain, compile and file in his office, for the information of the public, thirty days prior to the date of the election of any director as provided herein, a statement showing the total number of qualified electors in each election unit included in the district. The county boards of election commissioners shall furnish such information so far as obtainable from their records, duly certified, to the secretary of the district upon his request therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5443; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-133.
Term and oath of directors.

Directors selected from odd numbered subdistricts shall for the first term serve for a period which shall end two (2) years after the first Monday of May of the next even numbered year. Directors selected from even numbered subdistricts shall for the first term serve for a period which shall end four (4) years after the first Monday of May of the next even numbered year.

The regular term of directors of the district after the first term shall be for four (4) years. Each director shall hold office until his successor is selected and qualifies.

Each director shall, before entering upon the discharge of his duties, take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the Constitution of 1890. Such oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5443; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-135.
Vacancies in director’s office.

The death of a director, his resignation, his removal for cause by the appointing power, his disability to continue for any cause to act as director, or his change of residence from the district, shall vacate the office. Within twenty (20) days after a determination of the vacancy by the appointing power, a successor for the unexpired term shall be selected by such appointing power.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5449; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-137.
Compensation and expenses of directors.

Each director of the district shall receive compensation from the district for his services as such at the rate of not more than ten dollars ($10.00) for each day he shall attend meetings of the board or when he is engaged upon the business of the board, not to exceed the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) in any one year. He shall also be entitled to be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred by him in the performance of his duties required of him by law or by resolution or vote of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5450; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-139.
Board of directors to function as legislative body of district.

The board of directors shall constitute the legislative body of such district and determine all questions of policy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5451; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-141.
Powers of the district board.

The board of directors of any district shall have power and authority:

To exercise by vote, ordinance or resolution all of the general powers of the district.

To make all needful rules, regulations and by-laws for the management and the conduct of the affairs of the district and of the board.

To adopt a seal for the district, prescribe the style thereof, and alter the same at pleasure.

To lease, purchase, sell, convey and mortgage the property of the district and to execute all instruments, contracts, mortgages, deeds or bonds on behalf of the district in such manner as the board shall direct.

To appoint and fix the salaries and duties of such experts and attorneys as it deems necessary, to hold office during the pleasure of the board and upon such terms and conditions as the board may require.

To make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers in this article granted, including, but not limited to, contracts with any municipality, the United States of America, the President of the United States of America, Tennessee Valley Authority, the Federal Emergency Administrator of Public Works and any and all other authorities, agencies, and instrumentalities of the United States of America, for the purchase or sale of electric energy, and for the acquisition of all or any part of any utility or utilities. In connection with any such contract, the board may stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate including, but without limitation, covenants, terms and conditions with respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposing of the revenues of the utility operated and maintained by the district.

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its functions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5452; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-143.
Appointment of officers.

The board shall appoint a general manager, a secretary and a treasurer, and the board may appoint and fix the duties of such other officers as it deems necessary. Such appointees shall hold office during the pleasure of the board, and such appointees shall give such bonds and in such amounts as the board may require. The general manager shall not be, and the clerk and treasurer need not be, members of the board. The secretary and treasurer may be the same person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5451; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-145.
Qualifications, powers and duties of general manager.

The general manager shall be the chief executive officer of the district. He shall be chosen by the board of directors solely on the basis of his executive and administrative qualifications and need not, when appointed, be a resident of the state. All other things being equal, the board of directors shall appoint as general manager a person with experience in the construction, operation or management of public utilities. In case of the absence or disability of the manager, the board may designate some qualified person to perform the duties of the office during such absence or disability.

The general manager shall have full charge and control of the construction of the works of said district and of their maintenance and operation, and of the administration of the business affairs of said district. The powers and duties of the general manager shall be:

To see that all resolutions, rules and regulations of the district are enforced;

To appoint or hire, except as otherwise provided in this article, all heads of departments, subordinate officials and employees necessary for the administration of the affairs of said district, and to remove the same;

To attend to all meetings of the board of directors (but not to vote) and submit a general report of the affairs of the district, and to participate in the discussion of all matters coming before the board;

To keep the directors advised as to the financial condition and future needs of the district, and to prepare and submit an annual budget;

To prepare or cause to be prepared, all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of said district;

To perform such other and additional duties as the board of directors may require.

The general manager shall within sixty (60) days from the end of each fiscal year cause to be published a financial report showing the result of operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. Said publication shall be made at least three (3) times in newspapers of general circulation printed and published in the district, or, if there be no such newspaper in the district, then in some newspaper of general circulation within the district. So far as practical said publications shall be in different newspapers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5453; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-147.
Duties of secretary.

The principal duties of the secretary of the district shall be to act as secretary of the board and to record and sign all minutes of meetings of the board, including all resolutions and ordinances adopted by the board; to safely and systematically keep all records, files and papers of the board; to safely keep the corporate seal of the district and to affix the same on behalf of the board, and to all certificates by him made as secretary of the district; to sign, execute or acknowledge with the chairman of the board all contracts, deeds, leases or other instruments authorized by the board to be executed by or on behalf of the district, and, if authorized, to deliver the same; and to perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by law or by vote, resolution or ordinance adopted by the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5453; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-149.
Duties of treasurer.

The principal duties of the treasurer of the district shall be to demand, receive, keep and account for all moneys and credits of the district; to pay to the persons entitled thereto the amounts called for in the orders or warrants drawn upon him by the secretary of the district and to take and keep receipts, vouchers or other suitable evidences of payment therefor; to keep accurate account of all moneys received and disbursed by him and to render such accounts, statements and inventories of moneys and credits received and disbursed and on hand and generally of all matters pertaining to his office as the board of directors may require; and to perform such other duties as may be imposed upon him by law or by vote, resolution or ordinance adopted by the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5453; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-151.
Corporate purpose of district.

A district shall be created for the purpose of conducting and operating a utility, and to carry out such purpose it shall have power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, operate, maintain, extend or improve any utility within or without the district, and to furnish, deliver and sell to the public, to any municipality, to the state and to any public institution heat, light and power service and any other service, commodity or facility which may be produced or furnished in connection therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5447; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-153.
General powers of district.

Any district created pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be vested with all the powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purpose for which such district is created, capable of being delegated by the legislature. No enumeration of particular powers created in Section 77-5-155 shall be construed to impair or limit any general grant of power herein contained or to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those enumerated. The district is empowered to do all acts necessary, proper or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5447; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-155.
Specific powers of district.

Any district created pursuant to this article shall have the power:

To sue and be sued

To have a seal

To acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease or exercise of the power of eminent domain or other mode of acquisition and to hold and dispose of real and personal property of every kind within or without the district, subject to mortgages or any other liens.

To make and enter into contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds or leases.

To incur debts, to borrow money, to issue negotiable bonds and other evidences of indebtedness and to provide for the rights of holders thereof.

To fix, maintain and collect rates and charges for any service.

To pledge all or any part of its revenues.

To make such covenants in connection with the issuance of bonds, or to secure the payment of bonds, that a private business corporation can make under the general laws of the state, notwithstanding that such covenants may operate as limitations on the exercise of any power granted by this article.

To use any right of way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a utility, held by the state or any political subdivision thereof, provided that the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5447; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-157.
Exercise of eminent domain by district.

Any district shall have the power to condemn any land, easements, or rights of way either on, under or above the ground as the board may deem necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this article, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations or persons having the power of eminent domain, or otherwise held or used for public purposes. Such power of condemnation may be exercised in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by Chapter 27 of Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, or in the mode or method or procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary the judge of the circuit court in which such proceedings are filed shall upon application of the district and upon the deposit in the court, to the use of the person or persons lawfully entitled thereto, of such an amount as the judge may deem necessary to assure just compensation, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the judge in his discretion, may deem proper and just. Upon application of the parties in interest, the judge may order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in said proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5461; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-159.
Operations outside of state authorized.

To the extent necessary in the judgment of the board to make effective the powers conferred by this article, the district shall have the power to acquire, own, operate, maintain and/or improve a generating and/or transmission system or systems outside the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5448; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-161.
Issuance of bonds by district.

Each district shall have power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue its bonds in anticipation of its revenues. Said bonds may be issued for any corporate purpose or purposes of such district. Said bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board of such district and may be issued in one or more series, may bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, and be declared or become due before the maturity date thereof, as such resolution or resolutions may provide. Said bonds may be issued for money or property, at public or private sale for such price or prices, as the board shall determine, provided that the interest cost to maturity of the money or property (at its value as determined by such board, the determination of which shall be conclusive), received for any issue of said bonds, shall not exceed six (6) per centum per annum, payable semiannually. Said bonds may be repurchased by the district out of any funds available for such purpose at a price of not more than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, and all bonds so repurchased shall be canceled. Pending the preparation or execution of definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates or temporary bonds may be delivered to the purchaser of said bonds. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds and the interest coupons appertaining thereto, if any, issued pursuant to this article shall possess all of the qualities of negotiable instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5454; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-163.
Rights and remedies of bondholders.

In addition to all other remedies, any holder of a bond of any district incorporated under this article, including a trustee for bondholders, shall have the right, subject to any contractual limitations binding upon such bondholders or trustee, and subject to the prior or superior rights of others:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding, at law or in equity, to enforce his rights against such district and the board of such district, including the right to require such district and such board to fix and collect rates and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the revenues produced by such rates or charges, and to require such district and such board to carry out any other covenants and agreements with such bondholder and to perform its and their duties under this article.

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or a violation of the rights of such bondholder.

By action or suit in equity to require such board to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for such bondholder.

By suit, action or proceeding in court exercising equitable jurisdiction to obtain the appointment of a receiver of the utility or utilities owned or operated by the district, or any part or parts thereof, who may enter and take possession of such utility or any part or parts thereof, including all property, land, property rights, easements and other adjuncts of the utility. Such receiver may operate and maintain the same, and collect and receive all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as such district itself might do, and shall deposit all such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of such district as the court shall direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5455; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-165.
Reduction of rates.

After all proper charges against the revenues of a district have been made, any surplus remaining shall be devoted solely to the reduction of rates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5457; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-167.
Moneys of districts.

All moneys of a district, from whatever source derived, shall be deposited in one or more banks or trust companies, and, if the district shall so require, each of such accounts shall be continuously secured by a pledge of direct obligations of the United States of America or of the State of Mississippi having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, at all times at least equal to the balance on deposit in such account or accounts. Such securities shall either be deposited with the district or held by a trustee or agent satisfactory to the district. In lieu of any such pledge of such securities, said deposits may be secured by a surety bond or bonds which shall be in form, sufficiency and substance satisfactory to the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5458; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-169.
Municipal and county aid to districts.

Any municipality situated within the territorial limits of a district and any county a part of which is so situated, may advance funds to such district to pay the preliminary organization and administration expenses thereof, on such terms of repayment as the governing body of such municipality or county shall determine. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary, any such municipality or county is authorized and empowered to borrow money for a period not to exceed one year from the date of such borrowing, for the purpose of making such advances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5456; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-171.
Districts and their property subject to taxation.

All districts and their property shall be liable for taxes and shall be taxed and assessed in the same manner and to the same extent as privately owned utilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5459; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.

§ 77-5-173.
Declaration of purpose; construction; article complete in itself.

This article is for the public purpose of promoting the increased use of electricity in the urban and rural areas of this state, and of enabling the residents thereof to secure the benefit of the surplus power generated or to be generated by the Tennessee Valley Authority at Wilson Dam in the State of Alabama, or the power generated at any other works or dams. The powers granted by this article shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes hereof, and to this end every district shall have power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes hereof in addition to the powers expressly conferred in this article. This article is complete in itself and shall be controlling. The provisions of any other law, general, special or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers granted by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5460; Laws, 1936, ch. 187.